output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.aff
FLAG long
SFX EL Y 10
SFX EL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EL и о/xPxBxO .
SFX EL и у/xPxE .
SFX EL и ев/xPxE .
SFX EL и е/xPxE .
SFX EL и ах/xPxE .
SFX EL и ам/xPxE .
SFX EL и еју/xPxE .
SFX EL и ами/xPxE .
SFX EL и о/xPxE .

SFX EM Y 8
SFX EM 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EM и е/xPxBxO .
SFX EM и его/xPxE .
SFX EM 0 х/xPxE .
SFX EM и ем/xPxE .
SFX EM и ему/xPxE .
SFX EM 0 м/xPxE .
SFX EM 0 ми/xPxE .

SFX EN Y 12
SFX EN 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EN 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX EN ыровоз ировоз/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировозы/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировоза/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировозов/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировозу/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировозах/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировозам/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировозом/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировозами/xPxE .
SFX EN ыровоз ировозе/xPxE .

SFX EO Y 6
SFX EO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EO а е/xPxBxO .
SFX EO а 0 .
SFX EO 0 х/xPxE .
SFX EO 0 м/xPxE .
SFX EO 0 ми/xPxE .

SFX EP Y 6
SFX EP 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EP и е/xPxBxO .
SFX EP 0 ј/xPxE .
SFX EP и ах/xPxE .
SFX EP и ам/xPxE .
SFX EP и ами/xPxE .

SFX EQ Y 71
SFX EQ ти л .
SFX EQ ти ла .
SFX EQ ти ло .
SFX EQ ти ли .
SFX EQ асти у .
SFX EQ асти ем .
SFX EQ асти еш .
SFX EQ асти е .
SFX EQ асти емо .
SFX EQ асти ете .
SFX EQ асти ут .
SFX EQ ти ех .
SFX EQ ти еше .
SFX EQ ти ехмо .
SFX EQ ти есте .
SFX EQ ти еху .
SFX EQ асти и .
SFX EQ асти имо .
SFX EQ асти ите .
SFX EQ асти учи .
SFX EQ асти учего .
SFX EQ асти учему .
SFX EQ асти учим .
SFX EQ асти учем .
SFX EQ асти учих .
SFX EQ асти учими .
SFX EQ асти уча .
SFX EQ асти учу .
SFX EQ асти учеј .
SFX EQ асти учеју .
SFX EQ асти уче .
SFX EQ асти емы .
SFX EQ асти емого .
SFX EQ асти емому .
SFX EQ асти емым .
SFX EQ асти емом .
SFX EQ асти емо .
SFX EQ асти ема .
SFX EQ асти ему .
SFX EQ асти емој .
SFX EQ асти емоју .
SFX EQ асти еми .
SFX EQ асти еме .
SFX EQ асти емых .
SFX EQ асти емым .
SFX EQ асти емыми .
SFX EQ ти ши .
SFX EQ ти ша .
SFX EQ ти ше .
SFX EQ ти ены .
SFX EQ ти еного .
SFX EQ ти еному .
SFX EQ ти еным .
SFX EQ ти еном .
SFX EQ ти ени .
SFX EQ ти ене .
SFX EQ ти еных .
SFX EQ ти еными .
SFX EQ ти ена .
SFX EQ ти ену .
SFX EQ ти еној .
SFX EQ ти еноју .
SFX EQ ти ено .
SFX EQ ти енје/xPxE .
SFX EQ ти енја/xPxE .
SFX EQ ти енју/xPxE .
SFX EQ ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX EQ ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX EQ ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX EQ ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX EQ ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX ER Y 12
SFX ER 0 0/xPxE .
SFX ER а о/xPxBxO .
SFX ER ина ы/xPxE .
SFX ER а у/xPxE .
SFX ER а ы/xPxE .
SFX ER ина 0 .
SFX ER а є/xPxE .
SFX ER ина ах/xPxE .
SFX ER ина ам/xPxE .
SFX ER а оју/xPxE .
SFX ER ина ами/xPxE .
SFX ER а о/xPxE .

SFX ES Y 80
SFX ES ти л .
SFX ES ти ла .
SFX ES ти ло .
SFX ES ти ли .
SFX ES цати чу .
SFX ES цати чем .
SFX ES цати чеш .
SFX ES цати че .
SFX ES цати чемо .
SFX ES цати чете .
SFX ES цати чут .
SFX ES ти х .
SFX ES ти ше .
SFX ES ти хмо .
SFX ES ти сте .
SFX ES ти ху .
SFX ES цати чи .
SFX ES цати чимо .
SFX ES цати чите .
SFX ES цати чучи .
SFX ES цати чучего .
SFX ES цати чучему .
SFX ES цати чучим .
SFX ES цати чучем .
SFX ES цати чучих .
SFX ES цати чучими .
SFX ES цати чуча .
SFX ES цати чучу .
SFX ES цати чучеј .
SFX ES цати чучеју .
SFX ES цати чуче .
SFX ES цати чемы .
SFX ES цати чемого .
SFX ES цати чемому .
SFX ES цати чемым .
SFX ES цати чемом .
SFX ES цати чемо .
SFX ES цати чема .
SFX ES цати чему .
SFX ES цати чемој .
SFX ES цати чемоју .
SFX ES цати чеми .
SFX ES цати чеме .
SFX ES цати чемых .
SFX ES цати чемым .
SFX ES цати чемыми .
SFX ES ти вши .
SFX ES ти вшего .
SFX ES ти вшему .
SFX ES ти вшим .
SFX ES ти вшем .
SFX ES ти вших .
SFX ES ти вшими .
SFX ES ти вша .
SFX ES ти вшу .
SFX ES ти вшеј .
SFX ES ти вшеју .
SFX ES ти вше .
SFX ES ти ны .
SFX ES ти ного .
SFX ES ти ному .
SFX ES ти ным .
SFX ES ти ном .
SFX ES ти ни .
SFX ES ти не .
SFX ES ти ных .
SFX ES ти ными .
SFX ES ти на .
SFX ES ти ну .
SFX ES ти ној .
SFX ES ти ноју .
SFX ES ти но .
SFX ES ти нје/xPxE .
SFX ES ти нја/xPxE .
SFX ES ти нју/xPxE .
SFX ES ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX ES ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX ES ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX ES ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX ES ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX ET Y 99
SFX ET ти л .
SFX ET ти ла .
SFX ET ти ло .
SFX ET ти ли .
SFX ET ти ју .
SFX ET ти м .
SFX ET ти јеш .
SFX ET ти ш .
SFX ET ти је .
SFX ET ти 0 .
SFX ET ти јемо .
SFX ET ти мо .
SFX ET ти јете .
SFX ET и е .
SFX ET ти јут .
SFX ET ти х .
SFX ET ти ше .
SFX ET ти хмо .
SFX ET ти сте .
SFX ET ти ху .
SFX ET ти ј .
SFX ET ти јмо .
SFX ET ти јте .
SFX ET ти јучи .
SFX ET ти јучего .
SFX ET ти јучему .
SFX ET ти јучим .
SFX ET ти јучем .
SFX ET ти јучих .
SFX ET ти јучими .
SFX ET ти јуча .
SFX ET ти јучу .
SFX ET ти јучеј .
SFX ET ти јучеју .
SFX ET ти јуче .
SFX ET ти јемы .
SFX ET ти јемого .
SFX ET ти јемому .
SFX ET ти јемым .
SFX ET ти јемом .
SFX ET ти јемо .
SFX ET ти јема .
SFX ET ти јему .
SFX ET ти јемој .
SFX ET ти јемоју .
SFX ET ти јеми .
SFX ET ти јеме .
SFX ET ти јемых .
SFX ET ти јемым .
SFX ET ти јемыми .
SFX ET ти мы .
SFX ET ти мого .
SFX ET ти мому .
SFX ET ти мым .
SFX ET ти мом .
SFX ET ти мо .
SFX ET ти ма .
SFX ET ти му .
SFX ET ти мој .
SFX ET ти моју .
SFX ET ти ми .
SFX ET ти ме .
SFX ET ти мых .
SFX ET ти мым .
SFX ET ти мыми .
SFX ET ти вши .
SFX ET ти вшего .
SFX ET ти вшему .
SFX ET ти вшим .
SFX ET ти вшем .
SFX ET ти вших .
SFX ET ти вшими .
SFX ET ти вша .
SFX ET ти вшу .
SFX ET ти вшеј .
SFX ET ти вшеју .
SFX ET ти вше .
SFX ET ти ены .
SFX ET ти еного .
SFX ET ти еному .
SFX ET ти еным .
SFX ET ти еном .
SFX ET ти ени .
SFX ET ти ене .
SFX ET ти еных .
SFX ET ти еными .
SFX ET ти ена .
SFX ET ти ену .
SFX ET ти еној .
SFX ET ти еноју .
SFX ET ти ено .
SFX ET ти енје/xPxE .
SFX ET ти енја/xPxE .
SFX ET ти енју/xPxE .
SFX ET ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX ET ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX ET ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX ET ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX ET ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX EU Y 68
SFX EU сти дл .
SFX EU сти дла .
SFX EU сти дло .
SFX EU сти дли .
SFX EU сти ду .
SFX EU сти дем .
SFX EU сти деш .
SFX EU сти де .
SFX EU сти демо .
SFX EU сти дете .
SFX EU сти дут .
SFX EU сти дех .
SFX EU сти деше .
SFX EU сти дехмо .
SFX EU сти десте .
SFX EU сти деху .
SFX EU сти ди .
SFX EU сти димо .
SFX EU сти дите .
SFX EU сти дучи .
SFX EU сти дучего .
SFX EU сти дучему .
SFX EU сти дучим .
SFX EU сти дучем .
SFX EU сти дучих .
SFX EU сти дучими .
SFX EU сти дучадуче .
SFX EU сти дучудуче .
SFX EU сти дучејдуче .
SFX EU сти дучејудуче .
SFX EU сти домы .
SFX EU сти домого .
SFX EU сти домому .
SFX EU сти домым .
SFX EU сти домом .
SFX EU сти домо .
SFX EU сти домадомо .
SFX EU сти домудомо .
SFX EU сти домојдомо .
SFX EU сти домојудомо .
SFX EU сти домидомо .
SFX EU сти домедомо .
SFX EU сти домыхдомо .
SFX EU сти домымдомо .
SFX EU сти домымидомо .
SFX EU сти дши .
SFX EU сти дшадше .
SFX EU сти дены .
SFX EU сти деного .
SFX EU сти деному .
SFX EU сти деным .
SFX EU сти деном .
SFX EU сти дени .
SFX EU сти дене .
SFX EU сти деных .
SFX EU сти деными .
SFX EU сти денадено .
SFX EU сти денудено .
SFX EU сти денојдено .
SFX EU сти денојудено .
SFX EU сти денје/xPxE .
SFX EU сти денја/xPxE .
SFX EU сти денју/xPxE .
SFX EU сти денјем/xPxE .
SFX EU сти дениј/xPxE .
SFX EU сти денјам/xPxE .
SFX EU сти денјами/xPxE .
SFX EU сти денјах/xPxE .
