output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_KomboLatinicaKirilica.dic
колибри/EL
путујучи/EM
панцыровоз/EN
јајца/EO
очи/EP
уши/EP
пасти/EQ
данина/ER
клицати/ES
умыти/ET
сести/EU
медија/EO
дєјанја/EO
наставјенја/EO
тканина/ER
медвєдгризли/EL
мєшанина/ER
пони/EL
напасти/EQ
срдца/EO
вєречи/EM
почеткујучи/EM
лори/EL
приспособјенја/EO
зомби/EL
